Utah statutes.
77-32-401.   Indigent Defense Funds Board -- Members -- Administrative support.

(1)  There is created within the Division of Finance the Indigent Defense Funds Board composed of the following nine members:

(a)  two members who are current commissioners or county executives of participating counties appointed by the board of directors of the Utah Association of Counties;

(b)  one member at large appointed by the board of directors of the Utah Association of Counties;

(c)  two members who are current county attorneys of participating counties appointed by the Utah Prosecution Council;

(d)  the director of the Division of Finance or his designee;

(e)  one member appointed by the Administrative Office of the Courts; and

(f)  two members who are private attorneys engaged in or familiar with the criminal defense practice appointed by the members of the board listed in Subsections (1)(a) through (e).

(2)  Members shall serve four-year terms.  One of the county commissioners and one of the county attorneys appointed to the initial board shall serve two-year terms, and the remaining other members of the initial board shall be appointed for four-year terms.  After the initial two-year terms of the county commissioner and county attorney, those board positions shall have four-year terms.

(3)  A vacancy is created if a member appointed under:

(a)  Subsection (1)(a) no longer serves as a county commissioner or county executive; or

(b)  Subsection (1)(c) no longer serves as a county attorney.

(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, a replacement shall be appointed for the remaining unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.

(5)  The board may contract for administrative support for up to $15,000 annually to be paid proportionally from each fund.

(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(7)  Per diem and expenses for board members shall be paid proportionally from each fund.

(8)  Five members shall constitute a quorum and, if a quorum is present, the action of a majority of the members present shall constitute the action of the board.

